Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.021

License required.

It is a violation of RCW 18.130.190 for any person to practice optometry in this state without first obtaining a license from the secretary of health.

[ 1991 c 3 s 133; 1987 c 150 s 38.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.